Mississippi, session 2026, SB2199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-27-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-27-1.  (1)  The practice of podiatric medicine is that profession concerned with the prevention, examination, diagnosis and medical, surgical and adjuvant treatment of conditions of the human foot.  For the purposes of this chapter, "foot" means that part of the human anatomy which consists of the tarsal bones, metatarsal bones and phalanges. (2)  A podiatrist is a medical care provider who engages in the practice of podiatric medicine. (3)  A podiatrist may prescribe and administer drugs and tests, excluding general and spinal anesthesia, that are essential to the practice of podiatric medicine when used for or in connection with treatment of disorders of the human foot. (4)  A podiatrist who is properly licensed in Mississippi may perform surgical treatment of the ankle and governing structures and tissue when that podiatrist meets the following requirements: (a)  The podiatrist has completed a postgraduate surgical residency program of at least twenty-four (24) months in length that has been approved by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education and is currently eligible to become certified to perform reconstructive rearfoot and ankle surgery by the American Board of Foot and Ankle Surgery; and (b)  The podiatrist is certified by the American Board of Foot and Ankle Surgery to perform reconstructive rearfoot and ankle surgery. (5)  A licensed podiatrist may perform ankle surgery only in an accredited hospital licensed in the state.  The podiatrist shall have received surgical privileges by the medical staff of that facility to perform ankle surgery and other delineation of privileges. (6)  A podiatrist's surgical treatment of the ankle is limited to procedures listed by the Council of Podiatric Medical Education (CPME) as found in CPME 320, and its successors, as being required for graduation and certification in reconstructive rearfoot and ankle surgery. (7)  For purposes of this section, an accredited hospital is one that is actively licensed in the state by the Department of Health as an acute care hospital with surgical services available. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.